Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4767.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 424A.016, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Vesting schedule. new text begin (a) new text end If the articles of incorporation or bylaws of a defined contribution relief association provide a vesting schedule that satisfies the requirements of this subdivision, the relief association may pay a reduced service pension to a retiring member. For purposes of this section, "vests," "vesting," or "vested" means a nonforfeitable, unconditional, or legally enforceable right. A member vests in the member's account in accordance with the vesting schedule set forth in the relief association's articles of incorporation or bylaws. Provided a member meets the minimum age and service requirements of subdivision 2, the member is entitled to a service pension equal to the member's account, but only to the extent vested as provided in the vesting schedule set forth in the articles of incorporation or bylaws. deleted text begin In no event may the articles of incorporation or bylaws:deleted text end deleted text begin (1) require that a member have more than 20 years of active service to become 100 percent vested in the member's account; or deleted text end deleted text begin (2) provide for a larger vesting percentage than is provided in the following schedule with respect to the completed number of years of active service indicated in the schedule: deleted text end deleted text begin Completed Years of Active Service deleted text end deleted text begin Vested Percentage of Pension Amount deleted text end deleted text begin 5 deleted text end deleted text begin 40 percent deleted text end deleted text begin 6 deleted text end deleted text begin 52 percent deleted text end deleted text begin 7 deleted text end deleted text begin 64 percent deleted text end deleted text begin 8 deleted text end deleted text begin 76 percent deleted text end deleted text begin 9 deleted text end deleted text begin 88 percent deleted text end deleted text begin 10 deleted text end deleted text begin or more deleted text end deleted text begin 100 percent deleted text end new text begin (b) The vesting schedule in the articles of incorporation or bylaws must not require more active service than the following: new text end new text begin (1) through December 31, 2027, 20 years of active service to become 100 percent vested, with each member vesting in four percent increments for each completed year of active service, beginning with 40 percent upon completion of five years of active service; new text end new text begin (2) beginning on January 1, 2028, through December 31, 2029, 15 years of active service to become 100 percent vested, with each member vesting in six percent increments for each completed year of active service, beginning with 40 percent upon completion of five years of active service; and new text end new text begin (3) beginning on January 1, 2029, ten years of active service to become 100 percent vested, with each member vesting in 12 percent increments for each completed year of active service, beginning with 40 percent upon completion of five years of active service. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 424A.02, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Vesting schedule. new text begin (a)new text end If the articles of incorporation or bylaws of a defined benefit relief association provide a vesting schedule that satisfies the requirements of this subdivision, the relief association may pay a reduced service pension to a retiring member. For purposes of this section, "vests," "vesting," or "vested" means a nonforfeitable, unconditional, or legally enforceable right. A member vests in the member's accrued service pension in accordance with the vesting schedule set forth in the relief association's articles of incorporation or bylaws. Provided a member meets the minimum age and service requirements of subdivision 1, the member is entitled to the member's accrued service pension, but only to the extent vested as provided in the vesting schedule set forth in the articles of incorporation or bylaws. deleted text begin In no event may the articles of incorporation or bylaws:deleted text end deleted text begin (1) require that a member have more than 20 years of active service to become 100 percent vested in the member's accrued service pension; or deleted text end deleted text begin (2) provide for a larger vesting percentage than is provided in the following schedule with respect to the completed number of years of active service indicated in the schedule: deleted text end deleted text begin Completed Years of Active Service deleted text end deleted text begin Vested Percentage of Pension Amount deleted text end deleted text begin 5 deleted text end deleted text begin 40 percent deleted text end deleted text begin 6 deleted text end deleted text begin 52 percent deleted text end deleted text begin 7 deleted text end deleted text begin 64 percent deleted text end deleted text begin 8 deleted text end deleted text begin 76 percent deleted text end deleted text begin 9 deleted text end deleted text begin 88 percent deleted text end deleted text begin 10 deleted text end deleted text begin or more deleted text end deleted text begin 100 percent deleted text end new text begin (b) The vesting schedule in the articles of incorporation or bylaws must not require more active service than the following: new text end new text begin (1) through December 31, 2027, 20 years of active service to become 100 percent vested, with each member vesting in four percent increments for each completed year of active service, beginning with 40 percent upon completion of five years of active service; new text end new text begin (2) beginning on January 1, 2028, through December 31, 2029, 15 years of active service to become 100 percent vested, with each member vesting in six percent increments for each completed year of active service, beginning with 40 percent upon completion of five years of active service; and new text end new text begin (3) beginning on January 1, 2029, ten years of active service to become 100 percent vested, with each member vesting in 12 percent increments for each completed year of active service, beginning with 40 percent upon completion of five years of active service. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin Sections 1 and 2 are effective the day following final enactment. new text end